Utah statutes.
75-3-204.   Demand for notice of order or filing concerning decedent's
estate.
Any interested person desiring notice of any order or filing pertaining to a
decedent's estate may file a demand for notice with the court at any time
after the death of the decedent stating the name of the decedent, the nature
of his interest in the estate, and the demandant's address or that of his
attorney. The clerk shall mail a copy of the demand to the personal
representative if one has been appointed. After filing of a demand, no order
or filing to which the demand relates shall be made or accepted without notice
as prescribed in Section 75-1-401 to the demandant or his attorney. The
validity of an order which is issued or filing which is accepted without
compliance with this requirement shall not be affected by the error, but the
petitioner receiving the order or the person making the filing may be liable
for any damage caused by the absence of notice. The requirement of notice
arising from a demand under this provision may be waived in writing by the
demandant and shall cease upon the termination of his interest in the estate.
